Florida, session 2026, SB1308.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 40 41 Section 1.âSection 381.0026, Florida Statutes, is created 42 to read: 43 381.0026âReproductive freedom.â 44 (1)âSHORT TITLE.âThis section may be cited as the 45 âReproductive Freedom Act.â 46 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 47 (a)ââAbortionâ means any medical treatment intended to 48 induce the termination of a pregnancy. The term does not include 49 management of or care for a miscarriage. 50 (b)ââPregnancyâ means the human reproductive process 51 beginning with an implanted human embryo. 52 (c)ââReproductive health careâ means health care offered, 53 arranged, or furnished for the purpose of preventing pregnancy, 54 terminating a pregnancy, managing pregnancy loss, or improving 55 maternal health. The term includes, but is not limited to, 56 contraception, sterilization, preconception care, maternity 57 care, abortion care, family planning, and fertility services. 58 (3)âFUNDAMENTAL RIGHT TO REPRODUCTIVE HEALTH CARE.âThe 59 State Constitution establishes the principles of individual 60 liberty, personal privacy, and equality. The Legislature finds 61 that such principles ensure the fundamental right to 62 reproductive health care. Notwithstanding chapter 390 and any 63 other law, the right to reproductive health care includes, but 64 is not limited to, all of the following rights and protections: 65 (a)âEvery individual has a fundamental right to make 66 autonomous decisions about the individualâs own reproductive 67 health, including the right to use or refuse reproductive health 68 care. 69 (b)âEvery individual who becomes pregnant has a fundamental 70 right to choose whether to continue the pregnancy and give birth 71 or to obtain an abortion and to make autonomous decisions about 72 how to exercise this fundamental right. 73 (c)âThe state may not deny or interfere with an 74 individualâs fundamental right to access reproductive health 75 care. 76 (4)âHARASSMENT, DISCRIMINATION, CIVIL LIABILITY, AND 77 PROSECUTION FOR REPRODUCTIVE HEALTH CARE PROHIBITED.â 78 (a)âState or local law enforcement agencies or officials 79 may not harass or discriminate against an individual for 80 providing or obtaining reproductive health care or assisting 81 another person in doing so. 82 (b)âState or local law enforcement agencies or officials 83 may not penalize, prosecute, or otherwise take adverse action 84 against individuals based on such individualâs own exercise of 85 the fundamental rights under this section or such individualâs 86 own actual, potential, perceived, or alleged pregnancy outcomes, 87 including miscarriage, stillbirth, or abortion. State and local 88 law enforcement agencies and officials may not penalize, 89 prosecute, or otherwise take adverse action against any 90 individual for aiding or assisting another individual in 91 exercising that other individualâs right to reproductive health 92 care with voluntary consent. 93 (c)âAn individual may not be subject to civil liability for 94 exercising the individualâs fundamental rights under this 95 section. An individual who aids or assists another individual in 96 exercising the fundamental rights under this section may not be 97 subject to civil liability for his or her actions in aiding or 98 assisting in the exercise of such fundamental rights. 99 (d)âA fertilized egg, embryo, or fetus does not have 100 independent rights under the laws of this state. 101 (5)âLIMITATION.âA local unit of government may not regulate 102 an individualâs ability to freely exercise the fundamental right 103 to reproductive health care in a manner that is more restrictive 104 than that set forth in this section. 105 (6)âAPPLICABILITY.âThis section applies to all state and 106 local laws, ordinances, regulations, rules, policies, 107 procedures, practices, and government actions. 108 (7)âCONSTRUCTION.âThis section supersedes any provision of 109 chapter 390 in conflict with this section. 110 (8)âSEVERABILITY.âIf any provision of this section or its 111 application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the 112 invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of 113 the section which can be given effect without the invalid 114 provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this 115 section are severable. 116 Section 2.âSection 286.31, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 117 Section 3.âSection 381.00321, Florida Statutes, is 118 repealed. 119 Section 4.âSection 765.113, Florida Statutes, is repealed. 120 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.